Washington statutes.
RCW 32.16.030

Vacancies, when to be filled.

A vacancy in the board of trustees shall be filled by the board as soon as practicable, at a regular meeting thereof.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.16.030. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 36; RRS s 3365.]